apertium-is-sv.sv.dix
<pardef n="adressera__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nde</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="avsky__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dda</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/öra__vbmod"> <!-- Check this, is it a modal? -->
  <e>       <p><l>öra</l>       <r>öra<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ör</l>        <r>öra<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orde</l>      <r>öra<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ort</l>       <r>öra<s n="vbmod"/><s n="supn"/></r></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ant/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>og</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agit</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agen</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aget</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agna</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åg</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eende</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edd</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edda</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kok/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ade</l>       <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ade</l>       <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="skr/ika__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ika</l>       <r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iker</l>      <r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iks</l>       <r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ikes</l>      <r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ek</l>        <r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikit</l>      <r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ik</l>        <r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikande</l>    <r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iken</l>      <r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iket</l>      <r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikna</l>      <r>ika<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="följ/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="undanröja"><i>undanröj</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="överbrygga"><i>överbrygga</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dra"><i>dr</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="äga"><i>äg</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="böra"><i>b</i><par n="b/öra__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="återuppta"><i>återuppt</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="återupprätta"><i>återupprätta</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fördöma"><i>fördöm</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undvika"><i>undv</i><par n="skr/ika__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillgodose"><i>tillgodos</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="framställa"><i>framställ</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utbilda"><i>utbilda</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillfredsställa"><i>tillfredsställ</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="åtfölja"><i>åtfölj</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iaktta"><i>iaktt</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anta"><i>ant</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nöja"><i>nöj</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillvarata"><i>tillvarat</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rationalisera"><i>rationalisera</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hänga"><i>häng</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ringa"><i>ring</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bortse"><i>borts</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="häva"><i>häv</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="konkurrera"><i>konkurrera</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="framhäva"><i>framhäv</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gilla"><i>gilla</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bedöma"><i>bedöm</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bruka"><i>bruka</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förena"><i>förena</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="godkänna"><i>godkänn</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sy"><i>sy</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="se"><i>s</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ske"><i>ske</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förutse"><i>föruts</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="demonstrera"><i>demonstrera</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="motta"><i>mott</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="delta"><i>delt</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inta"><i>int</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ta"><i>t</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vidta"><i>vidt</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dröja"><i>dröj</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utse"><i>uts</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avse"><i>avs</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="väga"><i>väg</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förse"><i>förs</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beakta"><i>beakta</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avvika"><i>avv</i><par n="skr/ika__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vika"><i>v</i><par n="skr/ika__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="överta"><i>övert</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="åta"><i>åt</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inse"><i>ins</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anse"><i>ans</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="föreställa"><i>föreställ</i><par n="följ/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undanta"><i>undant</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="godta"><i>godt</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="misstro"><i>misstro</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anta">            <i>ant</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dra">             <i>dr</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ta">              <i>t</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ta i beslag">     <i>t</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/><p><l><b/>i<b/>beslag</l><r><g><b/>i<b/>beslag</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ske">             <i>ske</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avsky">           <i>avsky</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="så">              <i>så</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="citera">          <i>citera</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="koka">            <i>kok</i><par n="kok/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skrika">          <i>skr</i><par n="skr/ika__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="misstro">         <i>misstro</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="predika">         <i>predika</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sy">              <i>sy</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tro">             <i>tro</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tvinga">          <i>tvinga</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undfly">          <i>undfly</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="duka">            <i>duka</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="koncentrera">     <i>koncentrera</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sanera">          <i>sanera</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="visa">            <i>visa</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="se">              <i>s</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anse">            <i>ans</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
